Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 2. JUDICIAL BRANCH

SUBTITLE B. JUDGES

CHAPTER 34. CODE OF JUDICIAL CONDUCT; CANDIDATES FOR JUDICIAL OFFICE

Sec. 34.001. CANDIDATE SUBJECT TO CODE. (a) A person who has filed an application for a place on the ballot as provided by the Election Code for a judicial office listed in Subsection (b) is subject to Canon 7, Code of Judicial Conduct, and is subject to sanctions as provided by this chapter.

(b) This chapter applies to candidates for the following offices:

(1) chief justice or justice of the supreme court;

(2) presiding judge or judge of the court of criminal appeals;

(3) chief justice or justice of a court of appeals;

(4) district judge, including a criminal district judge;

(5) judge of a statutory county court;

(6) county judge who performs judicial functions;

(7) justice of the peace; and

(8) municipal court judge.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 425, Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 646, Sec. 4, eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 34.002. JUDGE. A candidate who is a judge subject to the authority of the State Commission on Judicial Conduct who violates the Code of Judicial Conduct is subject to sanctions by the commission.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 425, Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 1987.

Sec. 34.003. ATTORNEY. A candidate who is an attorney and who violates Canon 7, Code of Judicial Conduct, or any other relevant provision of that code is subject to sanctions by the state bar.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 425, Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 1987.

Sec. 34.004. OTHER CANDIDATE. A candidate other than a judge under Section 34.002 or an attorney under Section 34.003 who violates Canon 7, Code of Judicial Conduct, or any other relevant provision of that code is subject to review by the attorney general or the local district attorney for appropriate disciplinary action.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 425, Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 1987.